Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-526
State agencies; distribution of funds; uniformity; assumption of obligations; limit.

The state agencies provided for herein shall distribute and cause said funds to be used in as uniform and equal a manner as practicable for the benefit of the children to be assisted by such services, taking into consideration the health, moral surroundings, sanitary conditions, parental responsibility, mentality and other circumstances of each case. Obligations assumed shall not exceed income of the fund for child welfare for any given month, plus any balance remaining from a preceding month in such fund.

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 30, § 26, p. 189;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 43-526;

R.S.1943, § 43-526.